Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3920
Effect of registration.

(1) Upon registration
of a guardianship or protective order from another state, the guardian or
conservator may exercise in this state all powers authorized in the order
of appointment except as prohibited under the laws of this state, including
maintaining actions and proceedings in this state and, if the guardian or
conservator is not a resident of this state, subject to any conditions imposed
upon nonresident parties.

(2) A court
of this state may grant any relief available under the Nebraska Uniform Adult
Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act and other law of
this state to enforce a registered order.

Laws 2011, LB157, § 24.